Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 5 GENERAL PROVISIONS
23-5-127. Unique student identifying number - social security number - prohibition.

Each postsecondary institution in Colorado shall assign to each student enrolled in the institution a unique primary identifier that may be a series of numbers or characters.

On and after July 1, 2003, each postsecondary institution in Colorado shall take reasonable and prudent steps to ensure the privacy of a student's social security number.

On and after July 1, 2004, a postsecondary institution in Colorado shall not use a student's social security number or part of a student's social security number as the student's primary identifier.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the Colorado commission on higher education may allow a postsecondary institution in Colorado to use a student's social security number or part of a student's social security number as the student's primary identifier if:

The institution demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commission that the institution is unable to comply with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) because of the financial cost of compliance; and

The institution submits to the commission and the commission approves a plan and timetable for phasing out the use of a student's social security number or part of a student's social security number as the student's primary identifier.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, for each student who graduates from or was enrolled in a Colorado high school, a postsecondary institution in Colorado that is eligible for the college opportunity fund program created in section 23-18-201 shall use the unique student identifier assigned, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to section 22-11-104, C.R.S., to the student while he or she was enrolled in the elementary to secondary public education system, including public prekindergarten programs, as an alternative student identifier at the postsecondary institution.

Adams state university, Colorado Mesa university, Western Colorado university, and Metropolitan state university of Denver shall implement the provisions of subsection (4)(a) of this section on or before July 1, 2008. All other postsecondary institutions shall implement the provisions of subsection (4)(a) of this section on or before July 1, 2009.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1042, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2006:

(4) added, p. 715, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1065, § 4, effective May 23.

L. 2009:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 09-163), ch. 293, p. 1546, § 56, effective May 21.

L. 2011:

(4)(b) amended, (SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1368, § 23, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 760, § 18, effective May 19; (4)(b) amended, (SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 427, § 14, effective July 1; (4)(b) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1271, § 17, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3546, § 16, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (4)(b) by House Bill 12-1080, Senate Bill 12-148, and House Bill 12-1331 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (4)(b), see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2011. For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsection (4)(b), see section 1 of chapter 125, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

23-5-128. Meningococcal disease - information - immunity - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Institution" means any public or nonpublic postsecondary education institution in the state.

"New student" means each incoming freshman student residing in student housing, as defined by the institution, or any student who the institution requires to complete and return a standard certificate indicating immunizations received by the student as a requirement for residing in student housing.

On and after July 1, 2005, each institution shall provide to each new student, or, if a new student is under the age of eighteen years, to the student's parent or guardian, information concerning meningococcal disease, including but not limited to the following:

Meningococcal disease is a serious disease;

Meningococcal disease is a contagious, but a largely preventable, infection of the spinal cord fluid and the fluid that surrounds the brain;

Scientific evidence suggests that college students living in dormitory facilities are at a modestly increased risk of contracting meningococcal disease; and

Immunization against meningococcal disease decreases the risk of contracting the disease.

Website addresses, telephone numbers, or other similar information to assist a new student or the student's parent or legal guardian in identifying a location or locations where the new student may receive an immunization against meningococcal disease.

An institution may provide the information required by subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) exactly as written or through similar language that reasonably meets the intent of the notification requirement and is based upon established and scientifically recognized medical or epidemiological data.

On and after July 1, 2005, each institution shall require each new student who has not received a vaccination against meningococcal disease, or, if the new student is under the age of eighteen years, the student's parent or guardian, to check a box on a document provided by the institution stating that the signor has reviewed the information provided pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and has decided that the new student will not obtain a vaccination against meningococcal disease. An institution may include the acknowledgment required in this section on another signed document used to collect health or housing information that must be returned to the institution and that the institution is already required to retain for other purposes regarding the student's health or housing.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Require a student who is planning to reside in student housing to obtain the vaccination against meningococcal disease;

Require an institution to provide or pay for the vaccination of a student; or

Prohibit an institution from establishing additional requirements concerning meningococcal vaccination.

An institution that has made a reasonable effort to comply with this section shall not be liable for damages for injuries sustained by a student as a result of contracting meningococcal disease where the student's claim is based solely upon the provision of the information required by paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 484, § 1, effective August 4.

23-5-129. Governing boards - performance contract - authorization - operations - definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 712, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(e) and (6)(c) amended, p. 1015, § 8, effective June 2.

L. 2008:

(6)(b) amended, p. 1479, § 20, effective May 28.

L. 2010:

(4) repealed and (6)(c) and (10) amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, pp. 1847, 1841, §§ 21, 6, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

(1)(b), (2)(a), (2)(f), (5)(a), and (9) amended and (5)(a.5) and (11) added, (SB 11-052), ch. 232, pp. 998, 999, §§ 3, 4, effective May 27; (5)(a) and (9) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1162, § 51, effective August 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(b) and (11) amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 145, § 18, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

Entire section repealed, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 819, § 11, effective May 18.

23-5-130. Governing boards - fee-for-service contracts - authorization. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 712, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), and (2)(h) amended, p. 1015, § 7, effective June 2.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 611, § 3, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

Subsections (2)(b)(II), (2)(c)(II), and (2)(d)(II) provided for the repeal of subsections (2)(b), (2)(c), and (2)(d), respectively, effective July 1, 2006. (See L. 2005, p. 1015.)

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to fee-for-service contracts, see § 23-18-303.

23-5-130.5. Governing boards - tuition-setting - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1837, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 2014:

(2) amended and (2.5) added, (SB 14-001), ch. 138, p. 474, § 3, effective May 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1837.)

23-5-131. Governing boards - tuition - fixed rate contract - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

"Fixed rate" means the fixed tuition rate specified in a contract between a state-supported institution of higher education and a student enrolled in the institution.

"Program" means the fixed tuition rate program.

"Student" means a student who is classified for tuition purposes as an in-state student.

There is hereby established a fixed tuition rate program. The governing board of each state-supported institution of higher education that has been designated as an enterprise pursuant to section 23-5-101.7 may offer a fixed tuition rate to a student who is willing to enter into a contract with the institution for the fixed rate. A fixed-rate contract shall also specify the amount of the student fees collected by the institution as of the date of the contract and shall inform the student that the amount of student fees may increase over the term of the contract in accordance with the institution's student fee plan adopted pursuant to section 23-5-119.5.

If a student is unable to complete a degree program within the duration of the fixed-rate contract because a course is unavailable due to a lack of available classes or class space, the state-supported institution of higher education shall provide the course to the student free of charge.

Each governing board that is participating in the program shall establish guidelines for each institution under its control relating to the fixed tuition rate program that shall include, at a minimum, the degree of flexibility a student has in changing majors or degree programs without voiding a fixed-rate contract.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1410, § 1, effective August 10, 2011.)

Each state-supported institution of higher education under the direction and control of a governing board participating in the program shall publish information relating to the fixed-rate contract option in the institution's course catalog or student handbook and on the institutional website.

and (6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1338, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(5) repealed, (SB 11-101), ch. 42, p. 111, § 1, effective March 21; (1)(b), (1)(c), (2), (4)(a), and (4)(b) amended and (6) added, (HB 11-1301), ch. 297, p. 1410, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(6) repealed, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1399, § 59, effective May 25.

23-5-132. Governing boards - travel policies - exemption from state travel rules.

Each governing board shall adopt travel policies for the institutions of higher education under its control, including but not limited to the use of travel services or travel agencies by the employees of the governing board or said institutions. Any rules adopted by the state controller pursuant to section 24-30-202 (26), or by the executive director of the department of personnel pursuant to section 24-102-202, that impose restrictions or requirements pertaining to the use of travel services or travel agencies shall not apply to a governing board or state institution of higher education.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1017, § 12, effective June 2.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1051), ch. 99, p. 350, § 63, effective August 9.

23-5-133. Instructors - health benefits study - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 846, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2974, § 48, effective August 10.

23-5-134. Appointments to governing boards - considerations.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the governor shall consider, when appointing individuals to serve on governing boards of institutions of higher education, an individual's:

Commitment to public education;

Record of public or community service;

Knowledge of complex organizations and academic institutions;

Demonstrated collaborative leadership;

Commitment to open-minded, nonpartisan decision-making; and

Record of integrity and civic virtue.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1235, § 10, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as 23-5-133 in Senate Bill 06-204 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

23-5-135. Governing boards - underserved students - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1351, § 1, effective June 1.

23-5-136. Governing boards - online textbook program.

Each governing board of a state institution of higher education shall consider creation and implementation of an online textbook library at the institution to allow students to purchase only those materials needed for the applicable course work. In considering the program, the governing board, at a minimum, shall take into account both the costs to the institution of higher education and the potential for reduced costs to students. Whether an institution of higher education creates an online textbook library shall be at the sole discretion of the institution's governing board.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1351, § 1, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as 23-5-134 in House Bill 06-1024 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

23-5-137. Loan repayment assistance - legislative declaration - definitions.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Loan Repayment Assistance Act".

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that:

It is of great value to the state to encourage students and graduates of institutions of higher education to enter public interest careers;

With rising costs of education and the debt that many students incur to finance their education, there are increasing barriers to entering public interest employment because the pay is typically substantially lower than that of other employment sectors; and

Inspired by a tradition of public interest, the university of Colorado law school developed a loan repayment assistance program to encourage and assist students and graduates to enter careers related to public interest and to help improve access to the justice system.

The general assembly therefore declares that it is in the best interest of the state of Colorado to encourage and authorize institutions of higher education to create loan repayment assistance programs that provide for the partial or full repayment of the educational loans of students or graduates who enter public interest careers.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Institution of higher education" means a postsecondary educational institution established and existing pursuant to law.

"Program" means a loan assistance repayment program authorized pursuant to this article for students or graduates who enter public interest careers.

The governing board of each institution of higher education is hereby encouraged and authorized to establish a loan repayment assistance program to assist students or graduates from the institution who select careers in public interest. The governing board of each institution shall establish criteria and rules to govern the implementation and operation of the program at the institution. The program shall allow the governing board to provide a loan or a grant to a student or graduate of the institution in accordance with the criteria and rules set forth by the governing board pursuant to this section.

Private contributions made for the benefit of a program and other available funds shall fund a program at an institution of higher education. An institution of higher education shall hold moneys to support a program in a fund account, and any unexpended or unencumbered moneys remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the account and shall not revert or be transferred to another account or fund.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 431, § 1, effective April 9.

23-5-138. Textbooks - academic freedom - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adopting entity" means the person or persons responsible for selecting and ordering a textbook or supplemental learning material for use in a college course at a state institution of higher education.

"Bundle" means one or more college textbooks or other supplemental learning materials offered in combination with one or more additional educational products to be sold as course materials for a single price.

"College textbook" means a textbook or set of textbooks developed for use in a course in postsecondary education at a state institution of higher education. The term "college textbook" includes but need not be limited to custom textbooks and integrated textbooks.

"Course material" means any textbook or other instructional tool that is published with the intent that it be used for or in conjunction with classroom instruction and that is adopted for academic use by faculty members, instructors, or the person or entity in charge of selecting learning material at the state institution of higher education.

"Custom textbook" means a college textbook that is compiled at the direction of a faculty member, instructor, or other person or adopting entity in charge of selecting course materials at a state institution of higher education. A custom textbook may include but need not be limited to selections from original instructor materials, previously copyrighted publisher materials, copyrighted third-party works, or elements unique to a specific institution such as commemorative editions.

"Integrated textbook" means a college textbook that is combined with materials and is designed solely for use as a combined unit, or that is developed by a third party and that, according to third-party contractual agreements, a publisher may not offer separately from the textbook with which the materials are combined.

"Publisher" means a publisher of college textbooks or supplemental learning materials.

"State institution of higher education" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 23-18-102 (10).

"Substantial content" means a part of a college textbook, such as a new chapter, coverage of an additional historical era, a new theme, or new subject matter.

"Supplemental learning material" means educational material developed to accompany a college textbook. Supplemental learning material is not a component of an integrated textbook. Supplemental learning material may include but need not be limited to printed materials, computer disks, website access, and electronically distributed materials.

Beginning on or before July 1, 2009:

When a publisher provides a faculty member, instructor, or other person or adopting entity in charge of selecting course materials at a state institution of higher education with information regarding a college textbook or supplemental learning material, the publisher shall provide, in writing or electronically, the following information, at a minimum:

The price at which the publisher would make the textbook or supplemental learning material available;

The substantial content revisions made, if any, between the current edition of the college textbook or supplemental learning material and a previous edition;

Whether the college textbook or supplemental learning material is available in another format, including but not limited to paperback or unbound copies, and the price at which the publisher would make the college textbook or supplemental learning material in the other format available.

A publisher that sells a college textbook and any supplemental learning material accompanying that college textbook as a single bundle to a state institution of higher education shall also make available the college textbook and any of the supplemental learning materials as separate and unbundled items at separate prices.

To the maximum extent practicable, a publisher shall provide the information required in this subsection (2) for the development and provision of custom textbooks.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as superseding the institutional autonomy or academic freedom of a state institution of higher education or its faculty members or instructors in the selection of college textbooks and supplemental learning materials.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 335, § 2, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 108, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.